dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="ডা__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="দল__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="জন__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণ</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="শুভেচ্ছা"><i>শুভেচ্ছা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হরিণ"><i>হরিণ</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নাচা"><i>নাচা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মাথা"><i>মাথা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যবসা"><i>ব্যবসা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিচারক"><i>বিচারক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আঁকা"><i>আঁকা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাংলা"><i>বাংলা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কাক"><i>কাক</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাড়া"><i>সাড়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জন"><i>জন</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উঠা"><i>উঠা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গাওয়া"><i>গাওয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আনা"><i>আনা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বীর"><i>বীর</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিজ্ঞতা"><i>অভিজ্ঞতা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গভর্নর"><i>গভর্নর</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পতাকা"><i>পতাকা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দল"><i>দল</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তত্ত্বাবধায়ক"><i>তত্ত্বাবধায়ক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিথ্যা"><i>মিথ্যা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পালক"><i>পালক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাঙা"><i>ভাঙা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্যাডাররা"><i>ক্যাডাররা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রাখা"><i>রাখা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কমিশনার"><i>কমিশনার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সচিব"><i>সচিব</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘণ্টা"><i>ঘণ্টা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সমালোচক"><i>সমালোচক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিরোপা"><i>শিরোপা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পৃষ্ঠপোষক"><i>পৃষ্ঠপোষক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাড়া"><i>পাড়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যক্তিত্ব"><i>ব্যক্তিত্ব</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বকেয়া"><i>বকেয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তলা"><i>তলা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাঙ"><i>ব্যাঙ</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডিপ্লোমা"><i>ডিপ্লোমা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাড়া"><i>বাড়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাপ"><i>সাপ</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রধান"><i>প্রধান</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কুমির"><i>কুমির</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আত্মা"><i>আত্মা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিজাত"><i>অভিজাত</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মৎস্য"><i>মৎস্য</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দেওয়া"><i>দেওয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পরামর্শক"><i>পরামর্শক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আবহাওয়া"><i>আবহাওয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দেব"><i>দেব</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভিলা"><i>ভিলা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বৈরাচার"><i>স্বৈরাচার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চেনা"><i>চেনা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিড়াল"><i>বিড়াল</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিভাবান"><i>প্রতিভাবান</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মরা"><i>মরা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পর্যালোচনা"><i>পর্যালোচনা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মাছ"><i>মাছ</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডাকা"><i>ডাকা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিভাবক"><i>অভিভাবক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বানর"><i>বানর</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ধাওয়া"><i>ধাওয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অধিনায়ক"><i>অধিনায়ক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দার্শনিক"><i>দার্শনিক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নাগরিক"><i>নাগরিক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হওয়া"><i>হওয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আয়োজক"><i>আয়োজক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রযোজক"><i>প্রযোজক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সার্জন"><i>সার্জন</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাইলট"><i>পাইলট</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মেম্বার"><i>মেম্বার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গবেষক"><i>গবেষক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সার্জেন্ট"><i>সার্জেন্ট</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এজেন্ট"><i>এজেন্ট</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইঞ্জিনিয়ার"><i>ইঞ্জিনিয়ার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাইকমিশনার"><i>হাইকমিশনার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বেচ্ছাসেবক"><i>স্বেচ্ছাসেবক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্থনীতিবিদ"><i>অর্থনীতিবিদ</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংগঠক"><i>সংগঠক</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাগল"><i>ছাগল</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রাজনীতিবিদ"><i>রাজনীতিবিদ</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিনিধিদল"><i>প্রতিনিধিদল</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নাট্যকার"><i>নাট্যকার</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিক্ষাবিদ"><i>শিক্ষাবিদ</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শহীদ"><i>শহীদ</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চিন্তাধারা"><i>চিন্তাধারা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কুকুর"><i>কুকুর</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রাষ্ট্রপ্রধান"><i>রাষ্ট্রপ্রধান</i><par n="জন__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পড়াশুনা"><i>পড়াশুনা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কোয়া"><i>কোয়া</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীরতা"><i>গভীরতা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইস্তফা"><i>ইস্তফা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সরীসৃপ"><i>সরীসৃপ</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্ষাকাল"><i>বর্ষাকাল</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পোকামাকড়"><i>পোকামাকড়</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রুই"><i>রুই</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পন্থা"><i>পন্থা</i><par n="ডা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উল্লুক"><i>উল্লুক</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উভচর"><i>উভচর</i><par n="দল__n_mf"/></e>
